Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Part C. Reconciliation with Orders of Other States

407.5207.
Determination of controlling child support order.

If a proceeding is brought under this chapter and only one (1) tribunal has issued a child support order, the order of that tribunal controls and shall be recognized.

If a proceeding is brought under KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

and two (2) or more child support orders have been issued by tribunals of this state or another state or foreign country with regard to the same obligor and same child, a tribunal of this state having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and the individual obligee shall apply the following rules and by order shall determine which order controls and shall be recognized:

If only one (1) of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

, the order of that tribunal controls.

If more than one (1) of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under KRS 407.5101 to 407.5902:

An order issued by a tribunal in the current home state of the child controls; or

If an order has not been issued in the current home state of the child, the order most recently issued controls.

If none of the tribunals would have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction under KRS 407.5101 to 407.5902, the tribunal of this state shall issue a child support order, which controls.

If two (2) or more child support orders have been issued for the same obligor and same child, upon request of a party who is an individual or that is a support enforcement agency, a tribunal of this state having personal jurisdiction over both the obligor and the obligee who is an individual shall determine which order controls under subsection (2) of this section. The request may be filed with a registration for enforcement or registration for modification pursuant to Article 6 of this chapter, or may be filed as a separate proceeding.

A request to determine which is the controlling order shall be accompanied by a copy of every child support order in effect and the applicable record of payments. The requesting party shall give notice of the request to each party whose rights may be affected by the determination.

The tribunal that issued the controlling order under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section has continuing jurisdiction to the extent provided in KRS

407.5205

and

407.5206

.

A tribunal of this state that determines by order which is the controlling order under subsection (2)(a), (2)(b), or (3) of this section or that issues a new controlling order under subsection (2)(c) of this section shall state in that order:

The basis upon which the tribunal made its determination;

The amount of prospective support, if any; and

The total amount of consolidated arrears and accrued interest, if any, under all of the orders after all payments made are credited as provided in KRS

407.5209

.

Within thirty (30) days after issuance of an order determining which is the controlling order, the party obtaining the order shall file a certified copy of it in each tribunal that issued or registered an earlier order of child support. A party or support enforcement agency obtaining the order that fails to file a certified copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises. The failure to file does not affect the validity or enforceability of the controlling order.

An order that has been determined to be the controlling order, or a judgment for consolidated arrears of support and interest, if any, made pursuant to this section shall be recognized in proceedings under KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 22; 1998, ch. 101, § 3, 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 10, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 77, § 8, effective July 15, 2016.

407.5208.
Child support orders for two or more obligees.

In responding to registrations or petitions for enforcement of two (2) or more child support orders in effect at the same time with regard to the same obligor and different individual obligees, at least one (1) of which was issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign country, a tribunal of this state shall enforce those orders in the same manner as if the orders had been issued by a tribunal of this state.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 23; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 11, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5209.
Credit for payments.

A tribunal of this state shall credit amounts collected for a particular period pursuant to any child support order against the amounts owed for the same period under any other child support order for support of the same child issued by a tribunal of this state, another state, or a foreign country.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 24; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; repealed and reenacted by 2015 ch. 18, § 12, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5210.
Application of KRS 407.5101 to 407.5902 to nonresident subject to personal jurisdiction.

A tribunal of this state exercising personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in a proceeding under KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

, under other law of this state relating to a support order, or recognizing a foreign support order may receive evidence from outside this state pursuant to KRS

407.5316

, communicate with a tribunal outside this state pursuant to KRS

407.5320

, and obtain discovery through a tribunal outside this state pursuant to KRS

407.5318

. In all other respects, Articles 3 to 6 of this chapter do not apply, and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of this state.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 18, § 13, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5211.
Continuing exclusive jurisdiction to modify spousal support order.

A tribunal of this state issuing a spousal-support order consistent with the law of this state has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the spousal-support order throughout the existence of the support obligation.

A tribunal of this state may not modify a spousal support order issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign country having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over that order under the law of that state or foreign country.

A tribunal of this state that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a spousal-support order may serve as:

An initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce the spousal support order issued in this state; or

A responding tribunal to enforce or modify its own spousal support order.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 18, § 14, effective June 24, 2015.